Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-1213.03
Coroner or deputy coroner; training;
continuing education.

Every person who is elected or appointed as a coroner or
deputy coroner in or for the State of Nebraska shall satisfactorily complete
initial death investigation training within one year after the date of election
or appointment and thereafter annually complete continuing education as determined
by the council.

Laws 2009, LB671, § 5.